Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.110

Stormwater control facilities—Utility local improvement districts—Assessments.

A county may create utility local improvement districts for the purpose of levying and collecting special assessments on property specially benefited by one or more stormwater control facilities. The provisions of RCW 36.94.220 through 36.94.300 concerning the formation of utility local improvement districts and the fixing, levying, collecting and enforcing of special assessments apply to utility local improvement districts authorized by this section.

[ 1981 c 313 s 21.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.